Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
Mississippi River Parkway Commission

§ 55-5-51.
Creation of commission.

There is hereby created and established a commission to be known as the Mississippi River Parkway Commission of Mississippi, referred to as the commission in Sections 55-5-51 through 55-5-63.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9.

§ 55-5-53.
Composition of commission; appointment and terms of office of members.

The commission shall be composed of ten (10) members, of whom two (2) shall be residents of DeSoto, Tunica and Coahoma Counties; two (2) shall be residents of Bolivar and Washington Counties; two (2) shall be residents of Sharkey, Issaquena and Warren Counties; two (2) shall be residents of Claiborne and Jefferson Counties; and two (2) shall be residents of Adams and Wilkinson Counties. On the original commission, two (2) members shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4) and five (5) years, each. All successor members shall be appointed for terms of five years, except for members appointed to fill an unexpired term. Immediately upon making any appointment to the commission, the governor shall notify the Mississippi River Parkway Commission, referred to as the National Commission in Sections 55-5-51 through 55-5-63, giving the names and addresses of the member or members appointed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9.

§ 55-5-55.
Selection of officers; meetings; quorum.

At the first meeting of the commission, and annually thereafter, the members shall select a chairman and a secretary from the membership. Meetings of the commission shall be called by the chairman on his own motion or on request of any five (5) members. Except in the case of an emergency, notice of the time and place of each meeting shall be given to each member at least five (5) days prior to the date of the meeting. Every meeting of the commission shall be held at some suitable place in one (1) of the twelve (12) counties in which the Great River Road is situated, except that any meeting may be held at any other suitable place upon majority vote of the members of the commission. Any four (4) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting any business of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9.

§ 55-5-57.
Compensation of members.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services on the commission. Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending the regular meetings of the state commission or the annual or any special meeting of the National Commission. Such expenses shall be paid upon vouchers signed by the chairman of the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9; Laws, 1975, ch. 368, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1975).

§ 55-5-59.
Relationship with National Commission and Mississippi Highway Department.

The commission shall be an affiliate of the National Commission and shall cooperate with and assist the National Commission in promoting interest in, and the development and use of, the Great River Road as designated by the Federal Bureau of Roads. The commission shall also serve in an advisory capacity to the Mississippi Highway Department. The chairman of the commission shall be the Mississippi representative on the National Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9.

§ 55-5-61.
Assistance of commission by state agencies.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall designate one (1) employee of the Transportation Department who is an engineer or who has engineering experience, and the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall appoint one (1) member of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks staff, who shall advise with and assist the commission in carrying out its functions and duties under Sections 55-5-51 through 55-5-63.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 120, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-5-63.
Erection of signs along Great River Road.

The state highway commission is hereby authorized and directed to erect and maintain signs designating the route of the Great River Road through Mississippi. The signs used to designate the route shall be the standard marker developed and approved for the Great River Road by the National Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5984.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 256, §§ 1-9.